Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5766YH (5) 91 th/ns H.F. 2439 Section 1. Section 321.1, subsection 76, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 76. âSpecially constructed vehicleâ means every vehicle 3 of a type required to be registered under this chapter not 4 originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, 5 or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles 6 and not materially altered from its original construction. 7 âSpecially constructed vehicleâ includes a motorcycle assembled 8 by a person who is not a manufacturer if the assembled 9 motorcycle does not comply with the certification label 10 requirement under 49 C.F.R. pt. 567, regardless of whether 11 the motorcycle is constructed under a distinctive name, make, 12 model, or type. âSpecially constructed vehicleâ does not 13 include a street rod, replica vehicle, or glider kit vehicle. 14